btlx.noun.loc.lexd
PATTERNS
Root Cont ContCase
Root Sub SubCase
Root[alpha] Super SuperCase[alpha]
Root[beta] Super SuperCase[beta]
Root ApudCluster
Root[ifin] In[ifin] InCase[ifin]
Root[ufin] In[ufin] InCase[ufin]
Root[cfin] In[cfin] InCase[cfin]

LEXICON Root
гьи[beta,ifin] # окно
#амбур[beta,ufin]  крыша
хур[alpha,cfin] #поле

LEXICON Super
<n><super>:

LEXICON SuperCase
<essive>:у[alpha]
<essive>:е[beta]
<lative>:а[alpha,beta]
<elative>:уру[alpha]
<elative>:еру[beta]
<translative>:уку[alpha]
<translative>:еку[beta]

LEXICON Cont
<n><cont>:чӀ

LEXICON ContCase
<essive>:у
#<lative>:
<elative>:уру
<translative>:уку

PATTERN ApudCluster
(Apud[x] ApudCase[x])|(Apud[q] ApudCase[q])

LEXICON Apud
<n><apud>:x[x]
<n><apud>:къ[q]

LEXICON ApudCase
<essive>:e[x]
<essive>:и[x,q]
<lative>:a[x,q]
<elative>:еру[x]
<elative>:иру[x,q]
<translative>:еку[x]
<translative>:ику[x,q]

LEXICON In
<n><in>:лъ[ufin]
<n><in>:лълъ[ifin]
<n><in>:лӀ[cfin]

LEXICON InCase[ufin,cfin,ifin]
<essive>:и[-ifin]
<essive>:у[-cfin,-ufin]
<lative>:а
<elative>:иру
<translative>:ику

ALIAS InCase SubCase

LEXICON Sub
<n><sub>:кь
